California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(c) Whenever a minor who has been held in custody for more than 24 hours by the probation officer is subsequently released and no petition is filed, the probation officer shall prepare a written explanation of why the minor was held in custody for more than 24 hours. The written explanation shall be prepared within 72 hours after the minor is released from custody and filed in the record of the case. A copy of the written explanation shall be sent to the parents, guardian, or other person having care or custody of the minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 686, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

631.1.

When a minor willfully misrepresents himself to be 18 or more years of age when taken into custody by a peace officer or probation officer, and this misrepresentation effects a material delay in investigation which prevents the filing of a petition pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or the filing of a criminal complaint against him in a court of competent jurisdiction within 48 hours, such petition or complaint shall be filed within 48 hours from the time his true age is determined, excluding nonjudicial days. If, in such cases, the petition or complaint is not filed within the time prescribed by this section, the minor shall be immediately released from custody.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

632.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), unless sooner released, a minor taken into custody under the provisions of this article shall, as soon as possible but in any event before the expiration of the next judicial day after a petition to declare the minor a ward or dependent child has been filed, be brought before a judge or referee of the juvenile court for a hearing to determine whether the minor shall be further detained. Such a hearing shall be referred to as a “detention hearing.”

(b) Whenever a minor is taken into custody without a warrant on the belief that he or she has committed a misdemeanor not involving violence, a threat of violence, or possession or use of weapons, if the minor is not currently on probation or parole, he or she shall be brought before a judge or referee of the juvenile court for a detention hearing as soon as possible, but no later than 48 hours after having been taken into custody, excluding nonjudicial days, after a petition to declare the minor a ward has been filed. In all cases involving the detention of a minor pursuant to this subdivision where the minor will not be brought before the judge or referee of the juvenile court within 24 hours, the decision not to bring the minor before the judge or referee within 24 hours shall be subject to written review and approval by a probation officer who is a supervisor as soon as possible after it is known that the minor will not be brought before the judge or referee within 24 hours. However, if the decision not to bring the minor before the judge or referee within 24 hours is made by a probation officer who is a supervisor, the decision shall not be subject to review and approval. 

(c) If the minor is not brought before a judge or referee of the juvenile court within the period prescribed by this section, he or she shall be released from custody.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 686, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

633.

Upon his appearance before the court at the detention hearing, such minor and his parent or guardian, if present, shall first be informed of the reasons why the minor was taken into custody, the nature of the juvenile court proceedings, and the right of such minor and his parent or guardian to be represented at every stage of the proceedings by counsel.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

634.

When it appears to the court that the minor or his or her parent or guardian desires counsel but is unable to afford and cannot for that reason employ counsel, the court may appoint counsel. In a case in which the minor is alleged to be a person described in Section 601 or 602, the court shall appoint counsel for the minor if he or she appears at the hearing without counsel, whether he or she is unable to afford counsel or not, unless there is an intelligent waiver of the right of counsel by the minor. In any case in which it appears to the court that there is such a conflict of interest between a parent or guardian and child that one attorney could not properly represent both, the court shall appoint counsel, in addition to
 counsel already employed by a parent or guardian or appointed by the court to represent the minor or parent or guardian. In a county where there is no public defender, the court may fix the compensation to be paid by the county for service of that appointed counsel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 678, Sec. 7.   (SB 190)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

634.3.

(a) Counsel appointed pursuant to Section 634 to represent youth in proceedings under Sections 601 and 602 shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide effective, competent, diligent, and conscientious advocacy and make rational and informed decisions founded on adequate investigation and preparation.

(2) Provide legal representation based on the client’s expressed interests, and maintain a confidential relationship with the minor.

(3) Confer with the minor prior to each court hearing, and have sufficient contact with the minor to establish and
 maintain a meaningful and professional attorney-client relationship, including in the postdispositional phase.

(4) When appropriate, delinquency attorneys should consult with social workers, mental health professionals, educators, and other experts reasonably necessary for the preparation of the minor’s case, and, when appropriate, seek appointment of those experts pursuant to Sections 730 and 952 of the Evidence Code.

(5) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to modify the role of counsel pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 657.

(b) By July 1, 2016, the Judicial Council, in consultation and collaboration with delinquency defense attorneys, judges, and other justice partners including child development experts,
 shall adopt rules of court to do all of the following:

(1) Establish minimum hours of training and education, or sufficient recent experience in delinquency proceedings in which the attorney has demonstrated competence, necessary in order to be appointed as counsel in delinquency proceedings. Training hours that the State Bar has approved for Minimum Continuing Legal Education (MCLE) credit shall be counted toward the MCLE hours required of all attorneys by the State Bar.

(2) Establish required training areas that may include, but are not limited to, an overview of juvenile delinquency law and procedure, child and adolescent development, special education, competence and mental health issues, counsel’s ethical duties, advocacy in the postdispositional phase,
 appellate issues, direct and collateral consequences of court involvement for a minor, and securing effective rehabilitative resources.

(3) Encourage public defender offices and agencies that provide representation in proceedings under Sections 601 and 602 to provide training on juvenile delinquency issues that the State Bar has approved for MCLE credit.

(4) Provide that attorneys practicing in juvenile delinquency courts shall be solely responsible for compliance with the training and education requirements adopted pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 369, Sec. 2.   (AB 703)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

634.6.

Any counsel upon entering an appearance on behalf of a minor shall continue to represent that minor unless relieved by the court upon the substitution of other counsel or for cause.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 205.)
-------------------------------------------

635.

(a) The court will examine the minor, their parent, legal guardian, or other person having relevant knowledge, hear relevant evidence the minor, their parent, legal guardian, or counsel desires to present, and, unless it appears that the minor has violated an order of the juvenile court or has escaped from the commitment of the juvenile court or that it is a matter of immediate and urgent necessity for the protection of the minor or reasonably necessary for the protection of the person or property of another that they be detained or that the minor is likely to flee to avoid the jurisdiction of the court, the court shall make its order releasing the minor from custody.

(b) (1) The circumstances and gravity of the alleged offense may be considered, in conjunction with other factors, to determine whether it is a matter of immediate and urgent necessity for the protection of the minor or reasonably necessary for the protection of the person or property of another that the minor be detained.

(2) The court’s decision to detain shall be based on the above factors, and shall not be based solely on the minor’s county of residence. A minor shall be given equal consideration for release on home supervision pursuant to Section 628.1, which may include electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 628.2, regardless of whether the minor lives in the county where the offense occurred.
 The juvenile court has authority to order the minor be placed on home supervision, with or without electronic monitoring, regardless of the minor’s county of residence.

(3) If a minor is a dependent of the court pursuant to Section 300, the court’s decision to detain shall not be based on the minor’s status as a dependent of the court or the child welfare services department’s inability to provide a placement for the minor.

(c) (1) The court shall order release of the minor from custody unless a prima facie showing has been made that the minor is a person described in Section 601 or 602.

(2) If the court orders release of a minor who is a dependent of the court pursuant to Section 300, the court
 shall order the child welfare services department either to ensure that the minor’s current foster parent or other caregiver takes physical custody of the minor or to take physical custody of the minor and place the minor in a licensed or approved placement.

(d) If the probation officer has reason to believe that the minor is at risk of entering foster care placement as described in Section 11402, then the probation officer shall submit a written report to the court containing all of the following:

(1) The reasons why the minor has been removed from the parent’s custody.

(2) Any prior referrals for abuse or neglect of the minor or any prior filings regarding the minor pursuant to Section 300.

(3) The need, if any, for continued detention.

(4) The available services that could facilitate the return of the minor to the custody of the minor’s parents or guardians.

(5) Whether there are any relatives who are able and willing to provide effective care and control over the minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 608, Sec. 1.   (SB 448)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

635.1.

When the court finds a minor to be a person described by Section 602 and believes the minor may need specialized mental health treatment while the minor is unable to reside in his or her natural home, the court shall notify the director of the county mental health department in the county where the minor resides. The county mental health department shall perform the duties required under Section 5697.5 for all those minors.

Nothing in this section shall restrict the provision of emergency psychiatric services to those minors who have not yet reached the point of adjudication or disposition, nor shall it operate to restrict evaluations at an earlier stage of the proceedings or to restrict the use of Sections 4011.6 and 4011.8 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 854, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

636.

(a) If it appears upon the hearing that the minor has violated an order of the juvenile court or has escaped from a commitment of the juvenile court or that it is a matter of immediate and urgent necessity for the protection of the minor or reasonably necessary for the protection of the person or property of another that the minor be detained or that the minor is likely to flee to avoid the jurisdiction of the court, and that continuance in the home is contrary to the minor’s welfare, the court may make its order that the minor be detained in the juvenile hall or other suitable place designated by the juvenile court for a period not to exceed 15 judicial days and shall enter the order together with its findings of fact in support thereof in the records
 of the court. The circumstances and gravity of the alleged offense may be considered, in conjunction with other factors, to determine whether it is a matter of immediate and urgent necessity for the protection of the minor or the person or property of another that the minor be detained. The court’s decision to detain shall be based on the above factors, and shall not be based solely on the minor’s county of residence. A minor shall be given equal consideration for release on home supervision pursuant to Section 628.1, which may include electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 628.2, regardless of whether the minor lives in the county where the offense occurred. The juvenile court has authority to order the minor be placed on home supervision, with or without electronic
 monitoring, regardless of the minor’s county of residence.
 If a minor is a dependent of the court pursuant to Section 300, the court’s decision to detain shall not be based on the minor’s status as a dependent of the court or the child welfare services department’s inability to provide a placement for the minor.

(b) If the court finds that the criteria of Section 628.1 are applicable, the court shall place the minor on home supervision for a period not to exceed 15 judicial days, and shall enter the order together with its findings of fact in support thereof in the records of the court. If the court releases the minor on home supervision, the court may continue, modify, or augment any conditions of release previously imposed by the probation officer, or may impose new conditions on a minor released for the first time. If there are new or modified conditions, the minor shall be
 required to sign a written promise to obey those conditions pursuant to Section 628.1.

(c) If the probation officer is recommending that the minor be detained, the probation officer shall submit to the court documentation, as follows:

(1) Documentation that continuance in the home is contrary to the minor’s welfare shall be submitted to the court as part of the detention report prepared pursuant to Section 635.

(2) Documentation that reasonable efforts were made to prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the minor from the home and
 documentation of the nature and results of the services provided shall be submitted to the court either as part of the detention report prepared pursuant to Section 635, or as part of a case plan prepared pursuant to Section 636.1, but in no case later than 60 days from the date of detention.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (e), before detaining the minor, the court shall determine whether continuance in the home is contrary to the minor’s welfare and whether there are available services that would prevent the need for further detention. The court shall make that determination on a case-by-case basis and shall make reference to the documentation provided by the probation officer or other evidence relied upon in reaching its decision.

(1) If the minor can be
 returned to the custody of the minor’s parent or legal guardian at the detention hearing, through the provision of services to prevent removal, the court shall release the minor to the physical custody of the minor’s parent or legal guardian and order that those services be provided.

(2) If the minor cannot be returned to the custody of the minor’s parent or legal guardian at the detention hearing, the court shall state the facts upon which the detention is based. The court shall make the following findings on the record and reference the probation officer’s report or other evidence relied upon to make its setting determinations:

(A) Whether continuance in the home of the parent or legal guardian is contrary to the minor’s welfare.

(B) Whether reasonable efforts have been made to safely maintain the minor in the home of the minor’s parent or legal guardian and to prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the minor from the minor’s home. This finding shall be made at the detention hearing if possible, but in no case later than 60 days following the minor’s removal from the home.

(3) If the minor cannot be returned to the custody of the minor’s parent or legal guardian at the detention hearing, the court shall make the following orders:

(A) The probation officer shall provide services as soon as possible to enable the minor’s parent or legal guardian to obtain any assistance as may be needed to enable the parent or guardian to effectively provide the care and control necessary for the minor to
 return to the home.

(B) The minor’s placement and care shall be the responsibility of the probation department pending disposition or further order of the court.

(4) If the matter is set for rehearing pursuant to Section 637, or continued pursuant to Section 638, or continued for any other reason, the court shall find that the continuance of the minor in the parent’s or guardian’s home is contrary to the minor’s welfare at the initial petition hearing or order the release of the minor from custody.

(e) For a minor who is a dependent of the court pursuant to Section 300, the court’s decision to detain the minor shall not be based on a finding that continuance in the minor’s current placement is contrary to the minor’s
 welfare. If the court determines that continuance in the minor’s current placement is contrary to the minor’s welfare, the court shall order the child welfare services department to place the minor in another licensed or approved placement.

(f) For a placement made on or after October 1, 2021, each placement of the minor in a short-term residential therapeutic program shall comply with the requirements of Section 4096 and be reviewed by the court pursuant to Section 727.12.

(g) For a placement made on or after July 1, 2022, each placement of the minor in a community treatment facility shall comply with the requirements of Section 4096 and be reviewed by the court pursuant to Section 727.12.

(h) Whether the minor is
 returned home or detained, the court shall order the minor’s parent or guardian to cooperate with the probation officer in obtaining those services described in paragraph (1) of, or in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of, subdivision (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 608, Sec. 2.   (SB 448)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

636.1.

(a) When a minor is detained pursuant to Section 636 following a finding by the court that continuance in the home is contrary to the minor’s welfare and the minor is at risk of entering foster care, the probation officer shall, within 60 calendar days of initial removal, or by the date of the disposition hearing, whichever occurs first, complete a case plan.

(b) If the probation officer believes that reasonable efforts by the minor, his or her parent or legal guardian, and the probation officer will enable the minor to safely return home, the case plan shall focus on those issues and activities associated with those efforts, including a description of the strengths and needs of the minor and his or her family and identification of the services that will be provided to the minor and his or her family in order to reduce or eliminate the need for the minor to be placed in foster care and make it possible for the minor to safely return to his or her home.

(c) If, based on the information available to the probation officer, the probation officer believes that foster care placement is the most appropriate disposition, the case plan shall include all the information required by Section 706.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 332, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

636.2.

The probation officer may operate and maintain nonsecure detention facilities, or may contract with public or private agencies offering such services, for those minors who are not considered escape risks and are not considered a danger to themselves or to the person or property of another. Criteria to be considered for detention in such facilities shall include, but not be limited to: (a) the nature of the offense, (b) the minor’s previous record including escapes from secure detention facilities, (c) lack of criminal sophistication, and (d) the age of the minor. A minor detained in such facilities who leaves the same without permission may be housed in a secure facility following his apprehension, pending a detention hearing pursuant to Section 632.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1241.)
-------------------------------------------

637.

When a hearing is held under the provisions of this article and no parent or guardian of such minor is present and no parent or guardian has had actual notice of the hearing, a parent or guardian of such minor may file his affidavit setting forth such facts with the clerk of the juvenile court and the clerk shall immediately set the matter for rehearing at a time within 24 hours, excluding Sundays and nonjudicial days from the filing of the affidavit. Upon the rehearing, the court shall proceed in the same manner as upon the original hearing.

If the minor or, if the minor is represented by an attorney, the minor’s attorney, requests evidence of the prima facie case, a rehearing shall be held within three judicial days to consider evidence of the prima facie case. If the prima facie case is not established, the minor shall be released from detention.

When the court ascertains that the rehearing cannot be held within three judicial days because of the unavailability of a witness, a reasonable continuance may be granted for a period not to exceed five judicial days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1266.)
-------------------------------------------

638.

Upon motion of the minor or a parent or guardian of such minor, the court shall continue any hearing or rehearing held under the provisions of this article for one day, excluding Sundays and nonjudicial days.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

639.

Upon any hearing or rehearing under the provisions of this article, the court may order such minor or any parent or guardian of such minor who is present in court to again appear before the court or the probation officer or the county financial evaluation officer at a time and place specified in said order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1485, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

641.

Whenever any minor is taken into temporary custody under the provisions of this article in any county other than the county in which the minor is alleged to be within or to come within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, which county is referred to herein as the requesting county, the officer who has taken the minor into temporary custody may notify the law enforcement agency in the requesting county of the fact that the minor is in custody. When a law enforcement officer, of such requesting county files a petition pursuant to Section 656 with the clerk of the juvenile court of his respective county and secures a warrant therefrom, he shall forward said warrant, or a telegraphic copy thereof to the officer who has the minor in temporary custody as soon as possible within 48 hours, excluding Sundays and nonjudicial days, from the time said juvenile was taken into temporary custody. Thereafter an officer from said requesting county shall take custody of the minor within five days, in the county in which the minor is in temporary custody, and shall take the minor before the juvenile court judge who issued the warrant, or before some other juvenile court of the same county without unnecessary delay. If the minor is not brought before a judge of the juvenile court within the period prescribed by this section, he must be released from custody.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Wards—Commencement of Proceedings [650. - 664.]

650.

(a) Juvenile court proceedings to declare a minor a ward of the court pursuant to Section 601 are commenced by the filing of a petition by the probation officer except as specified in subdivision (b). 

(b) Juvenile court proceedings to declare a minor a ward of the court pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 601.3 may be commenced by the filing of a petition by the probation officer or the district attorney after consultation with the probation officer. 

(c) Juvenile court proceedings to declare a minor a ward of the court pursuant to Section 602 are commenced by the filing of a petition by the prosecuting attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1202, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

651.

Proceedings under this chapter may be commenced either in the juvenile court for the county in which a minor resides, or in which a minor is found, or in which the circumstances exist or acts take place to bring a minor within the provisions of Section 601 or Section 602.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1088, Sec. 9) by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1412, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

651.5.

For purposes of this article, “community-based organization” means a public or private nonprofit organization of demonstrated effectiveness that is representative of a community or significant segments of a community and provides educational, physical, or mental health, recreational, arts, and other youth development or related services to individuals in the community.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 323, Sec. 9.   (AB 901)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

652.

Whenever the probation officer has cause to believe that there was or is within the county, or residing therein, a person within the provisions of Section 601 or 602, the probation officer shall immediately make an investigation he or she deems necessary to determine whether proceedings in the juvenile court should be commenced, including whether reasonable efforts, as described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 727.4, have been made to prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the minor from his or her home. However, this section does not require an investigation by the probation officer with respect to a minor delivered or referred to an agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 626.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 997, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

652.5.

(a) Whenever an officer refers or delivers a minor pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 626, the agency to which the minor is referred or delivered shall immediately make such investigation as that agency deems necessary to determine what disposition of the minor that agency shall make and shall initiate a service program for the minor when appropriate.

(b) The service program for any minor referred or delivered to the agency for any act described in Section 602 shall include constructive assignments that will help the minor learn to be responsible for his or her actions. The assignments may include, but not be limited to, requiring the minor to
 repair damaged property or to make other appropriate restitution, or requiring the minor to participate in an educational or counseling program.

(c) If the referral agency does not initiate a service program on behalf of a minor referred to the agency within 20 calendar days, or initiate a service program on behalf of a minor delivered to the agency within 10 days, that agency shall immediately notify the referring officer of that decision in writing. The referral agency shall retain a copy of that written notification for 30 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 678, Sec. 8.   (SB 190)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

653.

Whenever any person applies to the probation officer or the district attorney in accordance with subdivision (e) of Section 601.3, to commence proceedings in the juvenile court, the application shall be in the form of an affidavit alleging that there was or is within the county, or residing therein, a minor within the provisions of Section 601 and setting forth facts in support thereof. The probation officer or the district attorney, in consultation with the probation officer, shall immediately make any investigation he or she deems necessary to determine whether proceedings in the juvenile court should be commenced.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 450, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

653.1.

Notwithstanding Section 653, in the case of an affidavit alleging that the minor is a person described in Section 602, the probation officer shall cause the affidavit to be immediately taken to the prosecuting attorney if it appears to the probation officer that the minor has been referred to the probation officer for any violation of an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 and that offense was allegedly committed when the minor was 14 years of age or older. If the prosecuting attorney decides not to file a petition, he or she may return the affidavit to the probation officer for any other appropriate action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 124.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

653.5.

(a) Whenever any person applies to the probation officer to commence proceedings in the juvenile court, the application shall be in the form of an affidavit alleging that there was or is within the county, or residing therein, a minor within the provisions of Section 602, or that a minor committed an offense described in Section 602 within the county, and setting forth facts in support thereof. The probation officer shall immediately make any investigation the probation officer deems necessary to determine whether proceedings in the juvenile court shall be commenced. If the probation officer determines that it is appropriate to recommend services to the family to prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the minor from the minor’s home, the probation officer shall make a referral to those services. The probation officer shall
 refer the youth to services provided by a health agency, community-based organization, local educational agency, an appropriate non-law-enforcement agency, or the probation department.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), if the probation officer determines that proceedings pursuant to Section 650 should be commenced to declare a person to be a ward of the juvenile court on the basis that the minor is a person described in Section 602, the probation officer shall cause the affidavit to be taken to the prosecuting attorney.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the probation officer shall cause the affidavit to be taken within 48 hours to the prosecuting attorney in all of the following cases:

(1) If it appears to the probation officer that the minor has been referred to the probation officer for any violation of
 an offense listed in subdivision (b), paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), or subdivision (e) of Section 707.

(2) If it appears to the probation officer that the minor is under 14 years of age at the date of the offense and that the offense constitutes a second felony referral to the probation officer.

(3) If it appears to the probation officer that the minor was 14 years of age or older at the date of the offense and that the offense constitutes a felony referral to the probation officer.

(4) If it appears to the probation officer that the minor has been referred to the probation officer for the sale or possession for sale of a controlled substance as defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11053) of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) If
 it appears to the probation officer that the minor has been referred to the probation officer for a violation of Section 11350 or 11377 of the Health and Safety Code where the violation takes place at a public or private elementary, vocational, junior high school, or high school, or a violation of Section 245.5, 626.9, or 626.10 of the Penal Code.

(6) If it appears to the probation officer that the minor has been referred to the probation officer for a violation of Section 186.22 of the Penal Code.

(7) If it appears to the probation officer that the minor has committed an offense in which the restitution owed to the victim exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000). For purposes of this paragraph, the definition of “victim” in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 730.6 and “restitution” in subdivision (h) of Section 730.6 shall apply.

(d) Except for offenses listed in paragraph (5), subdivision (c) shall not apply to a narcotics and drug offense set forth in Section 1000 of the Penal Code.

(e) The prosecuting attorney shall within their discretionary power institute proceedings in accordance with their role as public prosecutor pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 650 and Section 26500 of the Government Code. However, if it appears to the prosecuting attorney that the affidavit was not properly referred, that the offense for which the minor was referred should be charged as a misdemeanor, or that the minor may benefit from a program of informal supervision, they shall refer the matter to the probation officer for whatever action the probation officer may deem appropriate.

(f) In all matters where the minor is not in custody and is already a ward of the court or a probationer under Section 602, the prosecuting attorney, within five judicial days of receipt of the affidavit from the probation officer, shall institute proceedings in accordance with their role as public prosecutor pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 650 of this code and Section 26500 of the Government Code, unless it appears to the prosecuting attorney that the affidavit was not properly referred or that the offense for which the minor was referred requires additional substantiating information, in which case they shall immediately notify the probation officer of what further action they are taking.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1997.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 850, Sec. 1.   (AB 1643)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

653.7.

If the probation officer does not take action under Section 654 and does not file a petition in juvenile court within 21 court days after the application, or in the case of an affidavit alleging that a minor committed an offense described in Section 602 or alleging that a minor is within Section 602, does not cause the affidavit to be taken to the prosecuting attorney within 21 court days after the application, he or she shall endorse upon the affidavit of the applicant the decision not to proceed further and the reasons therefor and shall immediately notify the applicant of the action taken or the decision rendered by him or her under this section. The probation officer shall retain the affidavit and the endorsement thereon for a period of 30 court days after the notice to the applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1412, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

654.

(a) In any case in which a probation officer, after investigation of an application for a petition or any other investigation the probation officer is authorized to make, concludes that a minor is within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, or would come within the jurisdiction of the court if a petition were filed, the probation officer may, in lieu of filing a petition to declare a minor a ward of the court under Section 601 or requesting that a petition be filed by the prosecuting attorney to declare a minor a ward of the court under subdivision (e) of Section 601.3 or Section 602 and with consent of the minor and the minor’s parent or guardian, refer the minor to services provided by a health agency, community-based organization, local educational
 agency, an appropriate non-law-enforcement agency, or the probation
 department. If the services are provided by the probation department, the probation officer may delineate specific programs of supervision for the minor, not to exceed six months, and attempt thereby to adjust the situation that brings the minor within the jurisdiction of the court. This section does not prevent the probation officer from requesting the prosecuting attorney to file a petition at any time within the six-month period or a 90-day period thereafter. If the probation officer determines that the minor has not participated in the specific programs within 60 days, the probation officer may file a petition or request that a petition be filed by the prosecuting attorney. However, when in the judgment of the probation officer the interest of the minor and the community can be protected, the probation officer shall make a diligent effort to proceed under this section.

(b) The program of supervision of the minor undertaken pursuant to this section may call for the minor to obtain care and treatment for the misuse of, or addiction to, controlled substances from a county mental health service or other appropriate community agency.

(c) The program of supervision shall encourage the parents or guardians of the minor to participate with the minor in counseling or education programs, including, but not limited to, parent education and parenting programs operated by community colleges, school districts, or other appropriate agencies designated by the court if the program of supervision is pursuant to the procedure prescribed in Section 654.2.

(d) Further, a probation officer with
 consent of the minor and the minor’s parent or guardian may provide the following services in lieu of filing a petition:

(1) Maintain and operate sheltered-care facilities, or contract with private or public agencies to provide these services. The placement shall be limited to a maximum of 90 days. Counseling services shall be extended to the sheltered minor and the minor’s family during this period of diversion services. Referrals for sheltered-care diversion may be made by the minor, the minor’s family, schools, any law enforcement agency, or any other private or public social service agency.

(2) Maintain and operate crisis resolution homes, or contract with private or public agencies offering these services. Residence at these facilities shall be limited to 20 days during which
 period individual and family counseling shall be extended to the minor and the minor’s family. Failure to resolve the crisis within the 20-day period may result in the minor’s referral to a sheltered-care facility for a period not to exceed 90 days. Referrals shall be accepted from the minor, the minor’s family, schools, law enforcement, or any other private or public social service agency.
